Utah statutes.
59-5-206.   Interest and penalty -- Overpayments.

(1)  In case of any failure to make or file a return required by this chapter, the penalty provided in Section 59-1-401 and interest at the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402 shall be charged and added to the tax.  The amount so added to any tax, whether as a penalty, interest, or both, shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and as a part of the tax.

(2)  An overpayment of a tax imposed by this chapter shall accrue interest at the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.

